Massachusetts, session 194th, H3597.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
otherwise requires, have the following meanings:–
"Native American" as defined in the Native American Graves Protection and Repatriation
Act in accordance with 25 U.S.C. 3001 et seq.
"funerary objects" as defined in the Native American Graves Protection and Repatriation
Act in accordance with 25 U.S.C. 3001 et seq.
"sacred objects" as defined in the Native American Graves Protection and Repatriation
Act in accordance with 25 U.S.C. 3001 et seq.
of 2

"objects of cultural patrimony" as defined in the Native American Graves Protection and
Repatriation Act in accordance with 25 U.S.C. 3001 et seq.
SECTION 2. The penalties and requirements of the Native American Graves Protection
and Repatriation Act in accordance with 25 U.S.C. 3001 et seq. shall be enforced if an agency,
organization, entity, or department receiving funds of any kind from the Commonwealth or any
local government therein; or a trust, unincorporated association, nonprofit corporation organized
under Chapter 180 of the Massachusetts General laws or public charity duly registered with the
Office of the Attorney General moves to deacquisition any Native American funerary objects,
human remains, sacred objects, or objects of cultural patrimony.
of 2